Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-831
Pacific Conflict Stress Test Act, how cited.

Sections 81-831 to 81-836 shall be known and may be cited as the Pacific Conflict Stress Test Act.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 1.
April 17, 2024